Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-101
Code, how cited.

Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Criminal Code.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 991, § 8;

Laws 1982, LB 465, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 406, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 969, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 451, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 170, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 41;

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 10;

Laws 1990, LB 571, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1018, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 477, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1098, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 1184, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1035, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1129, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 908, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 90, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 814, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 6, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 49, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 163, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 511, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 276, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 824, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 943, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 57, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 287, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1086, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB142, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB764, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB155, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB252, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB594, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB894, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB20, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB226, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB3, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB44 § 1;

Laws 2014, LB403, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 15;

Laws 2015, LB390, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB136, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1009, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB487, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB931, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB990, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB7, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB519, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB686, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB814, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB881, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1152, § 14;

Laws 2022, LB519, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB922, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB559, § 1.